Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-151
Securities; violation; penalty.

Any common carrier which violates any of the provisions of sections 75-146 to 75-150 or which fails, omits, or neglects to obey, observe, or comply with any order, direction, or requirement of the commission under the provisions of such sections shall forfeit to the State of Nebraska a sum not to exceed five thousand dollars for each and every offense. Each violation of any such order or direction or requirement of such sections shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation, each day's continuance thereof shall be a separate and distinct offense. Each officer and agent of any common carrier who violates or procures, aids, or abets any violation by any such common carrier of any of the provisions of sections 75-146 to 75-150, who fails to obey, observe, and comply with any order of the commission or any provision of an order of the commission under the terms of such sections, or who procures, aids, or abets any such common carrier in its failure to obey, observe, and comply with any such order or provision shall be guilty of a Class III felony.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 51, p. 1373;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 199;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 62.